Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2449
Information to permitholder regarding
lost or stolen handgun or firearm.

The Nebraska State Patrol shall inform each permitholder,
upon the issuance or renewal of a permit to carry a concealed handgun, that
if a handgun, or other firearm, owned by such permitholder is lost or stolen,
the permitholder should notify his or her county sheriff or local police department
of that fact.

Laws 2010, LB817, § 6.